Massachusetts, session 194th, S401.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Chapter 6 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 
15ZZZZZZ, the following section:- 
Section 15AAAAAAA.The governor shall annually issue a proclamation setting apart 
March 21 as Massachusetts Child Nutrition Day and recommending that the day be observed in 
an appropriate manner by the people. 
SECTION 2. Chapter 71 is hereby amended by inserting, after section 99, the following 
new section:- 
Section 100. (a) The purpose of this section is to ensure that the students of the 
Commonwealth are appropriately nourished in order to support a healthier, livable and more 
equitable future for all. 

of 3 11  (b) For the purposes of this section, the following words shall have the following 
meanings:- 
(i) food service management company is defined as a commercial enterprise or a 
nonprofit organization which is or may be contracted with by the school food authority to 
manage any aspect of the school food service 
(ii) entrée is defined as the meat/meat alternate category within the USDA’s Federal 
Nutrition Standards 
(iii) Fiber-rich” is defined as an entrée  item that contains at least 14 g of fiber per 
1000kcal from whole food sources such as whole grains, legumes, beans, pulses, fruits, and 
vegetables 
(iv) “Reimbursable meal” is any meal that meets the United States Department of 
Agriculture (USDA) National School Lunch Program nutritional requirements for federal 
reimbursement at the annual allotted rate of any of the following: (a) free lunch; (b) reduced- 
price lunch; or (c) paid lunch 
(v) “ultra-processed food” is defined as industrial formulations of food substances never 
or rarely used in kitchens (such as high-fructose corn syrup, hydrogenated or interesterified oils, 
and hydrolysed proteins), or classes of additives designed to make the final product palatable, 
appealing, or preservable (such as flavours, flavour enhancers, colours, emulsifiers, emulsifying 
salts, sweeteners, thickeners, nitrates, nitrites, preservatives, and anti-foaming, bulking, 
carbonating, foaming, gelling and glazing agents) 

of 3 31  (c) Any food service management company selling food to Massachusetts public schools 
for our children to consume shall ensure that at least 50% of the entrées sold and served for lunch 
within school hours in schools, school districts, or other entities over the course of each week are 
healthy foods containing whole grains, vegetables, fruits, legumes and other fiber-rich proteins 
as part of a reimbursable meal offering within the federal National School Lunch Program. 
(d) No food service provider may sell or serve in Massachusetts public schools, school 
districts, or other entities more than 20% of entrée items that meet one or more of the following: 
qualify as ultra-processed; have a nutritional composition that includes more than 30 milligrams 
of cholesterol  more than 5% of the entrées’ total calories come from saturated fat as part of a 
weekly reimbursable meal offering within the federal National School Lunch 
(e) Each food service provider selling food to Massachusetts public schools for school 
children to consume, shall keep itemized nutrition data that is made publicly available on a 
monthly basis to demonstrate compliance with this statute. 
(f) Each food service management company will have a phase in period of three years 
following the initial date of their most recent contract with their respective school food authority 
or by the first day of the school calendar year 2033-2034, whichever comes first.